Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 4A Affiliate Transfers

7-1-320.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Affiliate transfer” means a transfer by which a bank or trust company delegates, assigns, or transfers to an affiliated trust company or to an affiliated bank which has received the required approvals from the appropriate regulatory authorities to exercise trust powers all of its rights, powers, privileges, accounts, and designations with respect to one or more of its various capacities as fiduciary.

“Affiliated trust company” means a trust company which is affiliated with a bank. A trust company shall be considered an affiliate with a bank in accordance with the definition of such term set forth in paragraph (1) of Code Section 7-1-4. For the purposes of this part, the term affiliated trust company shall also include an affiliated bank which has received the required approvals from the appropriate regulatory authorities to exercise trust powers.

“Bank” means a corporation as defined in either paragraph (7) or (23) of Code Section 7-1-4 and having its principal place of business in Georgia.

“Fiduciary” means a bank or trust company acting in such capacity as set forth in paragraph (20) of Code Section 7-1-4 or as further defined by regulations of the department.

“Trust company” means a corporation as defined in paragraph (40) of Code Section 7-1-4 or a national bank having:

Authority to conduct business only to the extent of its trust powers as provided in 12 U.S.C. Section 92a; and

A principal place of business in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-320

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 915, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on 1993 amendment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (1993).

7-1-321.
Affiliate transfers authorized; powers and duties of affiliated trust company transferees.

Any bank authorized by law to engage in the business of acting as a fiduciary is authorized and empowered to make an affiliate transfer whether or not each governing instrument expressly provides for or contemplates an affiliate transfer or whether or not the fiduciary capacity was created by will, indenture, trust, court order, agreement, or other means. No affiliate transfer shall constitute:

A resignation or disqualification of the bank as fiduciary; or

A relinquishment of trust powers by the bank making the affiliate transfer.

Upon execution of an instrument effecting an affiliate transfer by a bank, the affiliated trust company shall, as of the date specified in the instrument, have all of the rights, powers, privileges, appointments, accounts, and designations of the bank regarding each fiduciary capacity so transferred and shall have title to all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action, and each and every other interest of or belonging to or due to the bank as fiduciary shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in the affiliated trust company as fiduciary without further act or deed. The affiliated trust company shall file a certificate of transfer with the department setting forth its name, a copy of its governing instrument, a list of the banks with which it is affiliated, a statement of the facts which establish the affiliate relationship, and such other information as may be appropriate.

Upon an affiliate transfer by a bank, the affiliated trust company, in each fiduciary capacity transferred, shall thenceforth be responsible for the performance of all of the duties, responsibilities, and obligations of the bank in such fiduciary capacity, and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against the fiduciary may be prosecuted as if the affiliate transfer had not taken place and the affiliated trust company, as fiduciary, may be substituted in place of the bank, as fiduciary. Neither the rights of creditors to nor any liens upon the property held in any fiduciary capacity shall be impaired by any affiliate transfer.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-321

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1780, § 1.

7-1-322.
Effect of affiliate transfer on bank; abandonment of transfer; substituted fiduciary.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 7-1-321, no affiliate transfer shall relieve the bank of any liability with respect to any of its acts and doings as fiduciary, and the bank shall remain liable and responsible to all affiliate transfer beneficiaries and other parties at interest with respect to all actions of the affiliated trust company as if performed by the bank itself.

The bank shall be relieved of any claims, liabilities, or actions arising after the affiliate transfer where such affiliate transfer is expressly authorized by the terms of the instrument governing the fiduciary capacity.

Upon application by an interested party, the bank shall within 30 days either abandon the affiliate transfer subject to such application or proceed to have a successor fiduciary appointed as provided by law.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to impair any right of the grantor or beneficiaries of any fiduciary relationship under applicable instruments or otherwise to secure or provide for the appointment of a substituted fiduciary.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-322

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1244, § 1.

7-1-323.
Appointment of affiliated trust company as agent for bank; liability of bank for actions of agent.

In addition to and not in limitation of the other powers provided in this part, any bank shall be entitled and empowered to designate an affiliated trust company as its agent for the performance of all acts, obligations, and responsibilities of the bank with respect to any fiduciary capacity. In such event, the bank shall remain fully responsible and liable with respect to all actions of the affiliated trust company as if performed by the bank itself. No such agency relationship shall:

Be deemed an impermissible delegation of responsibility or duty by the bank; or

Constitute a resignation or disqualification of the bank as fiduciary or a relinquishment of trust powers by the bank.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-323

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 7.

7-1-324.
Designation of affiliate trust company as successor fiduciary.

Upon any affiliate transfer, the affiliate trust company may be designated in any deed, trust, agreement, filing, instrument, notice, certificate, pleading, or other document as successor fiduciary pursuant to this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-324

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1244, § 1.

7-1-325.
Other banking laws unaffected by part.

Except as expressly provided, nothing in this part shall be construed to amend or modify in any way the laws of the State of Georgia with respect to the establishment of banks, trust companies, branch banks, or bank holding companies or the conduct of the banking business or any part thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-325

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1244, § 1.